West Virginia, session 2026, HB4397.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 22E. WEST VIRGINIA LOTTERY INTERACTIVE WAGERING ACT. §29-22E-16. Interactive wagering revenues; accounting for the state’s share of revenue imposed for the privilege of offering West Virginia Lottery interactive wagering; limitation of other taxes; recoupment for improvements. (a) Imposition and rate of assessment. — For the privilege of holding a license to operate interactive wagering under this article, the state shall impose and collect 15 25 percent of the licensee’s adjusted gross interactive wagering receipts from the operation of West Virginia Lottery interactive wagering (hereinafter "privilege tax" or "tax"). The accrual method of accounting shall be used for purposes of calculating the amount of the tax owed by the licensee.(b) Operator revenue reports and payment of privilege tax. —(1) The tax levied and collected pursuant to §29-22E-16(a) of this code is due and payable to the commission in weekly installments on or before the Wednesday following the calendar week in which the adjusted gross interactive wagering receipts were received and the tax obligation was accrued.(2) The licensed operator shall complete and submit the return for the preceding week by electronic communication to the commission, on or before Wednesday of each week, in the form prescribed by the commission that provides:(A) The total gross interactive wagering receipts and adjusted gross interactive wagering receipts from operation of West Virginia Lottery interactive wagering during that week;(B) The tax amount for which the interactive wagering licensee is liable; and(C) Any additional information necessary in the computation and collection of the tax on adjusted gross interactive wagering receipts required by the commission.(3) The tax amount shown to be due shall be remitted by electronic funds transfer simultaneously with the filing of the return. All moneys received by the commission pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the interactive wagering fund in accordance with the provisions of this article.(c) Privilege tax obligation imposed by this section is in lieu of other taxes. — With the exception of the ad valorem property tax collected under chapter 11A of this code, the privilege tax on adjusted gross interactive wagering receipts imposed by this section is in lieu of all other state and local taxes and fees imposed on the operation of, or the proceeds from operation of, West Virginia Lottery interactive wagering, except as otherwise provided in this section. The consumers sales and services tax imposed pursuant to §11-15-1 et seq. of this code, the use tax imposed by §11-15A-1 et seq. of this code and any similar local tax imposed at the municipal or county level, shall not apply to the licensee’s gross receipts from any West Virginia Lottery interactive wagering or to the licensee’s purchase of interactive wagering equipment, supplies, or services directly used in operation of the interactive wagering authorized by this article.(d) Acquisition of any system or wagering equipment and other items related to the operation of West Virginia interactive wagering shall be considered "facility modernization improvements" eligible for recoupment as defined in §29-22A-10(b)(2) and §29-25-22(c) of this code. (e) Prohibition on credits. — Notwithstanding any other provision of this code to the contrary, no credit may be allowed against the privilege tax obligation imposed by this section or against any other tax imposed by any other provision of this code for any investment in gaming equipment or for any investment in or improvement to real property that is used in the operation of West Virginia Lottery interactive wagering.